test/src/morphology/N-Ж_Ф-железа_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - железа M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      железа+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: железа́
      железа+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: железу́
      железа+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: железы́
      железа+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: железе́
      железа+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: железе́
      железа+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: железо́й
      железа+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: же́лезы
      железа+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: же́лезы
      железа+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: желёз
      железа+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: железа́х
      железа+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: железа́м
      железа+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: железа́ми
